Utah statutes.
26-21a-101.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Breast cancer screening mammography" means a standard two-view per breast, low-dose as defined by the National Cancer Institute, radiographic examination of the breasts to detect unsuspected breast cancer using equipment designed and dedicated specifically for mammography.

(2)  "Diagnostic mammography" means mammography performed on a woman having suspected breast cancer.

(3)  "Facility" means a facility that provides screening or diagnostic breast mammography services.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1991 General Session

